Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 3
PROTECTIVE SERVICES

26-3-101 to 26-3-114. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article repealed, p. 1784, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 6 of chapter 119 in C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1991, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.